Ohio, session 136, HB285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3345.89 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 3345.89. (A) As used in this section, "state 6
university" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the 7
Revised Code. 8
(B) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, no 9
college football game played in this state shall commence prior 10
to three-thirty p.m. on the day of the competition when both of 11
the following circumstances apply: 12
(1) One competing team is the football team of a state 13
university. 14
(2) Both competing teams are ranked among the top ten 15
teams in the associated press poll, or its successor, of the 16
national collegiate athletic association's football bowl 17
subdivision, or its successor. 18
(C) Division (B) of this section does not apply if an 19

H. B. No. 285 Page 2
As Introduced
earlier start time of a college football game between two teams 20
is a college football tradition. For this purpose, a "college 21
football tradition" is a start time of a game between the teams 22
of two institutions whose football teams have competed against 23
each other at least fifty times and the start time has been the 24
same for at least ninety-five per cent of those games. 25
(D) If a game subject to division (B) of this section 26
starts at a time earlier than permitted by that division, the 27
attorney general shall impose a fine of ten million dollars 28
against either the host team's football athletic conference or 29
the television network broadcasting or streaming the game, 30
whichever party scheduled the earlier start time. 31
(E) No state university shall enter into or renew a 32
contract with the national collegiate athletic association, an 33
athletic conference, or a media entity under which any entity, 34
directly or indirectly, may compel or permit the university's 35
football team to commence a college football game that is 36
subject to division (B) of this section at a time that violates 37
that division. 38